sl-SI: Položaj zvočnikov v prenosniku: Integriran par; Leva; Levi in desni (par); Levi plus nizkotonec; Desna; Desni plus nizkotonec; Globokotonec; Drugo
zh-CN: 笔记本电脑中的扬声器位置: 集成对装; 左; 左右对装; 左扬声器加低音炮; 右; 右扬声器加低音炮; 低音炮; 其他
nb: Høyttalerposisjon i bærbar PC: Integrert par; Venstre; Venstre og høyre (par); Venstre pluss subwoofer; Høyre; Høyre pluss subwoofer; Subwoofer; Annet
lt-LT: Garsiakalbio padėtis nešiojamajame kompiuteryje: Integruota pora; Kairė; Kairė ir dešinė (pora); Kairė ir žemųjų dažnių garsiakalbis; Dešinė; Dešinė ir žemųjų dažnių garsiakalbis; Žemadažnis garsiakalbis; Kita
nl: Positie luidspreker in laptop: Geïntegreerd paar; Links; Links en rechts (paar); Links plus subwoofer; Rechts; Rechts plus subwoofer; Subwoofer; Andere
vi: Vị trí loa trong máy tính xách tay: Cặp tích hợp; Trái; Cặp trái và phải; Trái cộng loa siêu trầm; Phải; Phải cộng loa siêu trầm; Loa siêu trầm; Khác
th: ตำแหน่งลำโพงในแล็ปท็อป: คู่ลำโพงแบบบูรณาการ; ด้านซ้าย; ซ้ายและขวา (คู่); ซ้ายพร้อมซับวูฟเฟอร์; ด้านขวา; ขวาพร้อมซับวูฟเฟอร์; ซับวูฟเฟอร์; อื่นๆ
ko: 노트북 내 스피커 위치: 통합 페어; 왼쪽; 좌우 (페어); 왼쪽 플러스 서브우퍼; 오른쪽; 오른쪽 플러스 서브우퍼; 서브우퍼; 기타
hu: Hangszóró pozíciója a laptopban: Integrált pár; Bal oldal; Bal és jobb (pár); Bal plusz mélynyomó; Jobb oldal; Jobb plusz mélynyomó; Mélynyomó; Egyéb
en: Speaker position in laptop: Integrated Pair; Left; Left and Right (Pair); Left plus Subwoofer; Right; Right plus Subwoofer; Subwoofer; Other
hr-HR: Pozicija zvučnika u prijenosnom računalu: Integrirani par; Lijeva; Lijevi i desni (par); Lijevi plus subwoofer; Desna; Desni plus subwoofer; Subwoofer; Ostalo
sk-SK: Umiestnenie reproduktora v notebooku: Integrovaný pár; Vľavo; Ľavý a pravý (pár); Ľavý plus subwoofer; Vpravo; Pravý plus subwoofer; Subwoofer; Iné
es: Posición del altavoz en el portátil: Par integrado; Izquierda; Par izquierdo y derecho; Izquierdo más subwoofer; Derecha; Derecho más subwoofer; Subwoofer; Otros
zh-TW: 筆記型電腦內的揚聲器位置: 整合對; 左; 左右配對; 左側加重低音; 右; 右側加重低音; 重低音; 其他
bg-BG: Позиция на говорителя в лаптопа: Интегрирана двойка; Вляво; Лява и дясна (двойка); Ляв плюс субуфер; Вдясно; Десен плюс субуфер; Субуфер; Други
pt-PT: Posição do altifalante no portátil: Par integrado; Esquerda; Par esquerdo e direito; Esquerdo com subwoofer; Direita; Direito com subwoofer; Subwoofer; Outro
sv: Högtalarposition i bärbar dator: Integrerat par; Vänster; Vänster och höger (par); Vänster plus subwoofer; Höger; Höger plus subwoofer; Subwoofer; Övrigt
fr: Position des haut-parleurs sur l’ordinateur portable: Paire intégrée; Gauche; Gauche et droite (paire); Gauche plus caisson de basses; Droite; Droite plus caisson de basses; Caisson de basses; Autre
it: Posizione dell'altoparlante nel laptop: Coppia integrata; A sinistra; Sinistra e destra (coppia); Sinistra più subwoofer; A destra; Destra più subwoofer; Subwoofer; Altro
pt-BR: Posição do alto-falante no laptop: Par integrado; Esquerda; Par esquerdo e direito; Esquerdo com subwoofer; Direita; Direito com subwoofer; Subwoofer; Outro
ru: Расположение динамика в ноутбуке: Интегрированная пара; Слева; Левый и правый (пара); Левый плюс сабвуфер; Справа; Правый плюс сабвуфер; Сабвуфер; Другой
fi: Kaiuttimen sijainti kannettavassa: Integroitu pari; Vasen; Vasen ja oikea (pari); Vasen ja subwoofer; Oikea; Oikea ja subwoofer; Subwoofer; Muu
de: Lautsprecherposition im Laptop: Integriertes Paar; Links; Linkes und rechtes (Paar); Links plus Subwoofer; Rechts; Rechts plus Subwoofer; Subwoofer; Sonstiges
pl: Pozycja głośnika w laptopie: Para zintegrowana; Lewy; Lewy i prawy (para); Lewy plus subwoofer; Prawy; Prawy plus subwoofer; Subwoofer; Inne
cs: Poloha reproduktoru v notebooku: Integrovaný pár; Levá strana; Levý a pravý (pár); Levý se subwooferem; Pravá strana; Pravý se subwooferem; Subwoofer; Jiné
el: Θέση ηχείου στον φορητό υπολογιστή: Ενσωματωμένο ζευγάρι; Αριστερά; Αριστερό και δεξί (ζευγάρι); Αριστερό με υπογούφερ; Δικαίωμα; Δεξί με υπογούφερ; Subwoofer; Άλλο
ro-RO: Poziția difuzorului în laptop: Pereche integrată; Stânga; Stânga și dreapta (pereche); Stânga plus subwoofer; Dreapta; Dreapta plus subwoofer; Subwoofer; Altele
tr: Dizüstü hoparlör konumu: Entegre çift; Sol; Sol ve sağ (çift); Sol artı subwoofer; Sağ; Sağ artı subwoofer; Derin bas hoparlör; Diğer
ja: ラップトップ内のスピーカー位置: 内蔵ペア; 左; 左右（ペア）; 左＋サブウーファー; 右; 右＋サブウーファー; サブウーファー; その他
da: Højttalerposition i laptop: Integreret par; Venstre; Venstre og højre (par); Venstre plus subwoofer; Højre; Højre plus subwoofer; Subwoofer; Andet